North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 6C. Health and Wellness Trust Fund. [Repealed]

§§ 147-86.30 through 147-86.36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 6.11(a), effective August 14, 2011.

History.

S. 147-86.30; 2000-147, s. 2; 2004-179, s. 1.3; 2006-203, s. 122; 2008-187, s. 28; repealed by 2011-145, s. 6.11(a), effective August 14, 2011. s. 147-86.31; 2000-147, s. 2; repealed by 2011-145, s. 6.11(a), effective August 14, 2011. s. 147-86.32; 2000-147, s. 2; repealed by 2011-145, s. 6.11(a), effective August 14, 2011. s. 147-86.33; 2000-147, s. 2; repealed by 2011-145, s. 6.11(a), effective August 14, 2011. s. 147-86.34; 2000-147, s. 2; repealed by 2011-145, s. 6.11(a), effective August 14, 2011. s. 147-86.35; 2000-147, s. 2; 2004-196, s. 3; 2006-203, s. 123; repealed by 2011-145, s. 6.11(a), effective August 14, 2011. s. 147-86.36; 2000-147, s. 2; repealed by 2011-145, s. 6.11(a), effective August 14, 2011.

§§ 147-86.37 through 147-86.40.

Reserved for future codification purposes.